apertium-hun.hun.dix
  <!-- név : névek : nevet : neve -->
  <pardef n="n/év__n">
        <e><p><l>év</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>evet</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>évnek</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>évvel</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>évben</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>évhez</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>évbe</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>évnél</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>éven</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>évig</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="term"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>évek</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>években</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>eve</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>evünk</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>evük</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>evükhöz</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>evét</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>evéhez</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>evén</l><r>év<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- közép : közepek : közepet : közepe -->
    <pardef n="köz/ép__n">
        <e><p><l>ép</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>epe</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>épnek</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>éppel</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>épben</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>éphez</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>épbe</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>épnél</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>épen</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>épig</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="term"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>épek</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>épekben</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>epe</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>epünk</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>epük</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>epét</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>epén</l><r>ép<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- közép : közepek : közepet : közepe -->
    <pardef n="f/él__n">
      <e><p><l>él</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ele</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>élnek</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>éllel</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>élben</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>élhez</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>élbe</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>élre</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>élnél</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>élen</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>élig</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="term"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>élek</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>élekben</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ele</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>elünk</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>elük</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>elét</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>elén</l><r>él<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- válasz : választ : válaszok : válasszal -->
    <pardef n="vála/sz__n">
      <e><p><l>sz</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szt</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sznak</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sszal</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szban</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szon</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sznál</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szba</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szra</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szhoz</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szból</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szról</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sztól</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>szok</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szokat</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szoknak</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szoknal</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szokban</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szokon</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szoknál</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szokba</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szokra</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szokhoz</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szokból</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szokról</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szoktól</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>szom</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szod</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px2sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sza</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szunk</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szotok</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px2pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szuk</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>szában</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

    <e lm="álnév"><i>áln</i><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="angoltapasz"><i>angoltapa</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="árkászszakasz"><i>árkászszaka</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="árkuszkoszinusz"><i>árkuszkoszinu</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="árkuszszinusz"><i>árkuszszinu</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autóbusz"><i>autóbu</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bálnavadász"><i>bálnavadá</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bambusz"><i>bambu</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bányász"><i>bányá</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="becenév"><i>becen</i><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="belgyógyász"><i>belgyógyá</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bél"><i>b</i><par n="f/él__n"/></e>
    <e lm="busz"><i>bu</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cethalász"><i>cethalá</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cirkusz"><i>cirku</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cserép"><i>cser</i><par n="köz/ép__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csillagász"><i>csillagá</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csúfnév"><i>csúfn</i><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csupadísz"><i>csupadí</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cukrász"><i>cukrá</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dél"><i>d</i><par n="f/él__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dicshimnusz"><i>dicshimnu</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diligyógyász"><i>diligyógyá</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diszkosz"><i>diszko</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="előnév"><i>előn</i><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="év"><i/><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fajkultusz"><i>fajkultu</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="falragasz"><i>falraga</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="falszakasz"><i>falszaka</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fegyverravasz"><i>fegyverrava</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fejtámasz"><i>fejtáma</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fekvőtámasz"><i>fekvőtáma</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fél"><i>f</i><par n="f/él__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fókavadász"><i>fókavadá</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="folyószakasz"><i>folyószaka</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="főnév"><i>főn</i><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frontszakasz"><i>frontszaka</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gyógytornász"><i>gyógytorná</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gyűjtőnév"><i>gyűjtőn</i><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="házikolbász"><i>házikolbá</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="helynév"><i>helyn</i><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="helységnév"><i>helységn</i><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hírnév"><i>hírn</i><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hótorlasz"><i>hótorla</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hölgyválasz"><i>hölgyvála</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="igenév"><i>igen</i><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ingyencirkusz"><i>ingyencirku</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karácsonyikaktusz"><i>karácsonyikaktu</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kéztámasz"><i>kéztáma</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="különszakasz"><i>különszaka</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="közép"><i>köz</i><par n="köz/ép__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lábtámasz"><i>lábtáma</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="légtornász"><i>légtorná</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="makrokozmosz"><i>makrokozmo</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="melléknév"><i>mellékn</i><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="midibusz"><i>midibu</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mikrokozmosz"><i>mikrokozmo</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="motokrossz"><i>motokros</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nekropolisz"><i>nekropoli</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="név"><i>n</i><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nőgyógyász"><i>nőgyógyá</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nyél"><i>ny</i><par n="f/él__n"/></e>
    <e lm="orvvadász"><i>orvvadá</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paratífusz"><i>paratífu</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ragadványnév"><i>ragadványn</i><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ragtapasz"><i>ragtapa</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="síbusz"><i>síbu</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sorszámnév"><i>sorszámn</i><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sporthorgász"><i>sporthorgá</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tájkultusz"><i>tájkultu</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tél"><i>t</i><par n="f/él__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tetőterasz"><i>tetőtera</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trolibusz"><i>trolibu</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="utónév"><i>utón</i><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="utószakasz"><i>utószaka</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="válasz"><i>vála</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vezetéknév"><i>vezetékn</i><par n="n/év__n"/></e>
    <e lm="viszonválasz"><i>viszonvála</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
